src/morphology/hacks/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=neljäsneljättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljännessäneljättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsneljättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0neljäneljättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsneljättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0neljäneljättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsneljättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0neljättäneljättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsneljättä][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0neljäksineljättä NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT   ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsittänoniljardinneitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsiltänoniljardinneilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsillänoniljardinneilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsillenoniljardinneille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0neljänsinenoniljardinneine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0neljänsistänoniljardinneista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0neljänsinänoniljardinneina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0neljänsiennoniljardien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsiinnoniljardinneiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsissänoniljardinneissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0neljänsinnoniljardinnein   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0neljätnoniljardit   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0neljänsiänoniljardinneja   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0neljänsiksinoniljardinneiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0neljättänoniljarditta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänneltänoniljardilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljännellänoniljardilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljännellenoniljardille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0neljännestänoniljardista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0neljänänoniljardina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0neljännoniljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljättännoniljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljännessänoniljardissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0neljänoniljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0neljättänoniljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0neljäksinoniljardiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsittänoniljoonansitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsiltänoniljoonansilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsillänoniljoonansilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsillenoniljoonansille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0neljänsinenoniljoonansine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0neljänsistänoniljoonansista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0neljänsinänoniljoonansina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0neljänsiennoniljoonansien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsiinnoniljoonansiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsissänoniljoonansissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0neljänsinnoniljoonansin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0neljätnoniljoonat   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0neljänsiänoniljoonansia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0neljänsiksinoniljoonansiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0neljättänoniljoonatta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänneltänoniljoonalta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljännellänoniljoonalla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljännellenoniljoonalle   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0neljännestänoniljoonasta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0neljänänoniljoonana   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0neljännoniljoonan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljättännoniljoonaan   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljännessänoniljoonassa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0neljänoniljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0neljättänoniljoonaa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsnoniljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0neljäksinoniljoonaksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsittäoktiljardinneitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsiltäoktiljardinneilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsilläoktiljardinneilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsilleoktiljardinneille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0neljänsineoktiljardinneine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0neljänsistäoktiljardinneista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0neljänsinäoktiljardinneina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0neljänsienoktiljardien   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsiinoktiljardinneiin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsissäoktiljardinneissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=INSTRUCTIVETRUCTIVE]:0neljänsinoktiljardinnein   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0neljätoktiljardit   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0neljänsiäoktiljardinneja   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0neljänsiksioktiljardinneiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0neljättäoktiljarditta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänneltäoktiljardilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljännelläoktiljardilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljännelleoktiljardille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ELATIVETIVETIVE]:0neljännestäoktiljardista   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ESSIVEIVEIVE]:0neljänäoktiljardina   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=GENITIVEITIVEITIVE]:0neljänoktiljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=ILLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljättänoktiljardin   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=INESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljännessäoktiljardissa   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=NOMINATIVEINATIVEINATIVE]:0neljäoktiljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=PARTITIVETITIVETITIVE]:0neljättäoktiljardia   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljardis][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=SG][CASE=TRANSLATIVENSLATIVENSLATIVE]:0neljäksioktiljardiksi   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsittäoktiljoonansitta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ABLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsiltäoktiljoonansilta   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ADESSIVESSIVESSIVE]:0neljänsilläoktiljoonansilla   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=ALLATIVEATIVEATIVE]:0neljänsilleoktiljoonansille   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
[WORD_ID=neljäsoktiljoonas][POS=NUMERAL][SUBCAT=ORD][NUM=PL][CASE=COMITATIVEITATIVEITATIVE]:0neljänsineoktiljoonansine   NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;
